Utah statutes.
51-9-409.   Guardian Ad Litem Services Account established -- Funding -- Uses.

(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the Guardian Ad Litem Services Account, for the purpose of funding the Office of Guardian Ad Litem, in accordance with the provisions of Sections 78A-6-901 and 78A-6-902. 

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the Division of Finance shall allocate 1.75% of the collected surcharge established in Section 51-9-401 to the Guardian Ad Litem Services Account. 

(3)  The amount allocated under Subsection (2) may not exceed the amount appropriated to the Guardian Ad Litem Services Account by the Legislature.

